Illinois, session 104th, SB3783.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Early childhood education credit.8    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 92026, a taxpayer who is the custodian of one or more children 10who attend an eligible preschool program in the State during 11the taxable year shall be allowed a credit against the tax 12imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount 13equal to 100% of the eligible expenses incurred by the 14taxpayer during the taxable year in sending the child to the 15eligible preschool program, but not to exceed $1,500 per child 16in any taxable year. 17    (b) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 18the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 19the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 20may be refunded to the taxpayer. 21    (c) As used in this Section: 22    "Custodian" means an Illinois resident who is the parent 23or legal guardian of a child who is 3 to 5 years of age during   SB3783- 2 -LRB104 19262 HLH 32708 b1the taxable year. 2    "Eligible expenses" means tuition, fees, and necessary 3school supplies associated with attendance at an eligible 4preschool, but does not include any expenses for which the 5taxpayer claims a deduction against the taxpayer's federal 6income taxes for the same taxable year. 7    "Eligible preschool" means a preschool educational program 8for children ages 3 to 5 that is operated by a public school 9district or other entity that is eligible to conduct a 10preschool educational program and that employs at least one 11teacher who holds a Professional Educator License with an 12early childhood education endorsement. 13    (d) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 14250.  15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.